Florida, session 2026, SB928.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as âMissyâs Law.â 16 Section 2.âSection 903.0472, Florida Statutes, is created 17 to read: 18 903.0472âMandatory remand to custody upon conviction of 19 dangerous crimes.â 20 (1)âNotwithstanding any provision in this chapter or 21 chapter 924 to the contrary, the court shall remand a person to 22 custody immediately, and the person shall remain in custody 23 pending sentencing without the possibility of release on bond, 24 if the person pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, or is found 25 guilty of, regardless of adjudication, a dangerous crime as 26 defined in s. 907.041(5)(a). 27 (2)âThis section applies regardless of whether the person 28 intends to appeal or has filed a notice of appeal. 29 (3)âThis section does not apply if the plea or finding of 30 guilt that required the person to be remanded to custody under 31 subsection (1) has been: 32 (a)âVacated; 33 (b)âReversed on appeal; 34 (c)âSet aside by judgment of acquittal; or 35 (d)âOtherwise nullified. 36 (4)âThis section may not be construed to allow the remand 37 of a person to custody if such person has served the maximum 38 statutory sentence for the offense. 39 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 40 907.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 41 907.041âPretrial detention and release.â 42 (5)âPRETRIAL DETENTION.â 43 (a)âAs used in this subsection, âdangerous crimeâ means any 44 of the following: 45 1.âArson; 46 2.âAggravated assault; 47 3.âAggravated battery; 48 4.âIllegal use of explosives; 49 5.âChild abuse or aggravated child abuse; 50 6.âAbuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, or 51 aggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult; 52 7.âAircraft piracy; 53 8.âKidnapping; 54 9.âHomicide; 55 10.âManslaughter, including DUI manslaughter and BUI 56 manslaughter; 57 11.âSexual battery; 58 12.âRobbery; 59 13.âCarjacking; 60 14.âLewd, lascivious, or indecent assault or act upon or in 61 presence of a child under the age of 16 years; 62 15.âSexual activity with a child, who is 12 years of age or 63 older but less than 18 years of age, by or at solicitation of 64 person in familial or custodial authority; 65 16.âBurglary of a dwelling; 66 17.âStalking and aggravated stalking; 67 18.âAct of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28; 68 19.âHome invasion robbery; 69 20.âAct of terrorism as defined in s. 775.30; 70 21.âManufacturing any substances in violation of chapter 71 893; 72 22.âAttempting or conspiring to commit any such crime; 73 22.23.âHuman trafficking; 74 23.24.âTrafficking in any controlled substance described in 75 s. 893.135(1)(c)4.; 76 24.25.âExtortion in violation of s. 836.05; and 77 25.26.âWritten threats to kill in violation of s. 836.10; 78 26.âAny violation related to computer pornography or child 79 exploitation as described in s. 847.0135; and 80 27.âAttempting or conspiring to commit any such crime. 81 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.